Utah statutes.
63C-11-204.   Inspectors.
(1)  The commission may appoint one or more official representatives to be
designated as inspectors, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission.
(2)  Each inspector must receive from the commission a card authorizing that
inspector to act as an inspector for the commission.
(3)  An inspector may not promote or sponsor any contest.
(4)  Each inspector may receive a fee approved by the commission for the
performance of duties under this chapter.
